Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1569
Limitation on liability; exceptions.

Section 81-1568 shall not apply to any person:

(1) Whose act or omission caused in whole or in part such actual or threatened discharge and who would otherwise be liable; or

(2) Who receives compensation other than reimbursement for out-of-pocket expenses for his or her services in rendering such assistance or advice.

Laws 1984, LB 420, § 3.